Utah statutes.
62A-4a-109.   Eligibility -- Fee schedules.

(1)  The division may establish, by rule, eligibility standards for consumers.

(2)  The division shall assess a fee for services that it provides in accordance with this chapter, based on the fee schedule approved in accordance with Section 62A-4a-102.



Amended by Chapter 75, 2009 General Session

